Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2886
Delegated dispensing permit; workers;
training; requirements; documentation.

(1) A delegating pharmacist
shall conduct the training of public health clinic workers. The training shall
be approved in advance by the board.

(2) A delegating pharmacist shall conduct training of dialysis drug
or device distributor workers. The training shall be based upon the standards
approved by the board.

(3) The public health clinic, the dialysis drug or device distributor,
and the delegating pharmacist shall be responsible to assure that approved
training has occurred and is documented.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 25;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 78;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 60;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.55;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 982;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 5.